Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,156
Medical director; appointment.

The Director of Correctional Services shall appoint a medical director for the department who shall be a medical doctor. The medical director shall be a person familiar with principles of quality assurance and internal credentialing procedures and shall be under the sole immediate supervision of the Director of Correctional Services.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 4.